Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 19.1
Dam Permits

46-19.1-1.
Permits required for certain dams.

Any person who owns or operates a dam that has the capacity to store greater than one thousand four hundred (1,400) normal storage acre feet of water shall apply to the director of the department of environmental management for a permit to raise or lower the water level behind the dam. The owner or operator shall apply for a permit, and until such time as a permit is issued by the director, the owner or operator shall operate the dam in a manner that is consistent with historic use as determined by the director. The director may enforce this section in accordance with chapters 17.1 and 17.6 of title 42. This section shall not apply to dams that impound water for a public water supply system as defined in §

46-13-2

. The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 170, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 171, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.